District of Columbia statutes.
24-241.10

Prisoner not agent, employee or servant of District.

Except when employed and paid by the District of Columbia for the performance of work for the District of Columbia government, no prisoner employed in the free community under the provisions of this subchapter shall, while working in such employment in the free community or going to or from such employment, be deemed to be an agent, employee, or servant of the District of Columbia government.

Nov. 10, 1966, 80 Stat. 1521, Pub. L. 89-803, § 12
1981 Ed., § 24-470.
1973 Ed., § 24-470.